District of Columbia statutes.
1-618.02

Conflicts of interest.

No employee, member of a board or commission, or a public official of the District government shall engage in outside employment or private business activity or have any direct or indirect financial interest that conflicts or would appear to conflict with the fair, impartial, and objective performance of officially assigned duties and responsibilities.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1802, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(c)(4), 59 DCR 1862

History

1981 Ed., § 1-619.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-348.2.

Prior Codifications

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-124 added “member of a board or commission, or a public official.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(c)(4) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Emergency Legislation